hr-HR: Stil montaže konektora: Adapter; Kabelski; Montaža na kućište; Konverter; Spojnica; Montaža na DIN šinu; Prolazna spojnica; Slobodno viseći; Inline; PCB površinska montaža; PCB prolazna rupa; Montaža na ploču; Ugradnja na ploču (prednja); Ugradnja na ploču (stražnja); Ostalo
tr: Konnektör montaj stili: Adaptör; Kablo; Şasi montajı; Dönüştürücü; Birleştirici; DIN ray montajı; Geçişli birleştirici; Serbest asılı; Çizgide; PCB yüzey montajı; PCB delikli montaj; Panel montajı; Panel montajı (ön); Panel montajı (arka); Diğer
sl-SI: Slog montaže priključka: Adapter; Gosta in dolga; Montaža na šasijo; Pretvornik; Spojka; Montaža na letev DIN; Prevodna spojka; Prosto viseč; Prednja; PCB površinska montaža; PCB skoznje luknje; Montaža na ploščo; Montaža na ploščo (spredaj); Montaža na ploščo (zadaj); Drugo
fr: Style de montage du connecteur: Adaptateur; Câble; Montage sur châssis; Convertisseur; Coupleur; Montage sur rail DIN; Coupleur traversant; Libre; En ligne; Montage en surface PCB; Montage traversant PCB; Montage sur panneau; Montage sur panneau (avant); Montage sur panneau (arrière); Autre
zh-TW: 連接器安裝形式: 變壓器; 纜線; 機殼安裝; 轉換器; 耦合器; DIN 導軌安裝; 貫通式耦合器; 自由懸掛式; 直排; PCB 表面貼裝; PCB 通孔式; 面板安裝; 面板安裝（前方）; 面板安裝（後方）; 其他
ru: Тип монтажа разъема: Адаптер; Кабель; Монтаж на шасси; Преобразователь; Соединитель; Монтаж на DIN-рейку; Проходной соединитель; Свободно висящий; Встроенная; Поверхностный монтаж на плату; Монтаж в отверстия платы; Панельный монтаж; Панельное крепление (фронтальное); Панельное крепление (заднее); Другой
sk-SK: Štýl montáže konektora: Adaptér; Kábel; Montáž na šasi; Konvertor; Spojka; Montáž na DIN lištu; Priechodná spojka; Voľne visiaci; Inline; PCB povrchová montáž; PCB priechodná diera; Panelová montáž; Panelová montáž (predná); Panelová montáž (zadná); Iné
ro-RO: Stil de montare a conectorului: Adaptor; Clasic; Montare pe șasiu; Convertor; Cuplaj; Montare pe șină DIN; Cuplaj de trecere; Suspendat liber; În linie; Montare pe suprafață PCB; PCB cu găuri de trecere; Montare pe panou; Montare pe panou (față); Montare pe panou (spate); Altele
es: Estilo de montaje del conector: Adaptador; Cable; Montaje en chasis; Convertidor; Acoplador; Montaje en riel DIN; Acoplador de paso; Colgante libre; En línea; Montaje superficial en PCB; PCB con orificios pasantes; Montaje en panel; Montaje en panel (frontal); Montaje en panel (trasero); Otros
en: Connector mounting style: Adapter; Cable; Chassis mount; Converter; Coupler; DIN rail mount; Feed-through coupler; Free-hanging; Inline; PCB surface mount; PCB through-hole; Panel mount; Panel mount (front); Panel mount (rear); Other
pl: Sposób montażu złącza: Adapter; Kabel; Montaż w obudowie; Konwerter; Łącznik; Montaż na szynie DIN; Łącznik przelotowy; Swobodnie zawieszony; Wbudowany; Montaż powierzchniowy PCB; Montaż przewlekany PCB; Montaż panelowy; Montaż panelowy (przedni); Montaż panelowy (tylny); Inne
el: Στυλ τοποθέτησης συνδετήρα: Προσαρμογέας; Σύρμα; Τοποθέτηση σε σασί; Μετατροπέας; Συζευκτήρας; Τοποθέτηση σε ράγα DIN; Διαμπερής συζευκτήρας; Ελεύθερης ανάρτησης; Ενσωματωμένο; Επιφανειακή τοποθέτηση PCB; Διαμπερής οπή PCB; Τοποθέτηση σε πίνακα; Επιτοίχια στήριξη (μπροστά); Επιτοίχια στήριξη (πίσω); Άλλο
cs: Styl montáže konektoru: Adaptér; Kabel; Montáž na šasi; Převodník; Spojka; Montáž na DIN lištu; Průchozí spojka; Volně visící; Inline; Povrchová montáž na DPS; Průchozí montáž na DPS; Panelová montáž; Montáž na panel (přední); Montáž na panel (zadní); Jiné
ko: 커넥터 장착 스타일: 어댑터; 케이블; 섀시 마운트; 컨버터; 커플러; DIN 레일 마운트; 피드스루 커플러; 자유 걸이형; 인라인; PCB 표면 실장; PCB 스루홀; 패널 마운트; 패널 마운트 (전면); 패널 마운트 (후면); 기타
da: Stikmonteringstype: Adapter; Kabel; Chassismontering; Konverter; Kobling; DIN-skinne-montering; Gennemføringskobling; Frithængende; Inline; PCB overflademontering; PCB gennem-hul; Panelmontering; Panelmontering (front); Panelmontering (bagside); Andet
fi: Liittimen asennustyyli: Sovitin; Kaapeli; Runkokiinnitys; Muunnin; Kytkin; DIN-kiskokiinnitys; Läpisyöttökytkin; Vapaasti riippuva; Sisäänrakennettu; Piirilevyn pintaliitos; Piirilevyn läpivientireikä; Paneelikiinnitys; Paneelikiinnitys (etu); Paneelikiinnitys (taka); Muu
zh-CN: 连接器安装样式: 适配器; 线缆; 机箱安装; 转换器; 耦合器; DIN 导轨安装; 馈通耦合器; 自由悬挂; 嵌入式; PCB 表面贴装; PCB 通孔; 面板安装; 面板安装（前）; 面板安装（后）; 其他
pt-PT: Estilo de montagem do conector: Adaptador; Cabo; Montagem em chassis; Conversor; Acoplador; Montagem em calha DIN; Acoplador passante; Livre suspenso; Em linha; Montagem superficial PCB; PCB através de orifício; Montagem em painel; Montagem em painel (frontal); Montagem em painel (traseiro); Outro
hu: Csatlakozó szerelési stílusa: Adapter; Kábel; Vázra szerelhető; Átalakító; Csatoló; DIN sínre szerelhető; Átvezető csatoló; Szabadon lógó; Soros; NYÁK felületre szerelt; NYÁK átmenőfuratos; Panelre szerelhető; Panel rögzítés (elöl); Panel rögzítés (hátul); Egyéb
pt-BR: Estilo de montagem do conector: Adaptador; Cabo; Montagem em chassi; Conversor; Acoplador; Montagem em trilho DIN; Acoplador de passagem; Suspenso livre; Em linha; Montagem superficial em PCB; Montagem através de furo em PCB; Montagem em painel; Montagem em painel (frontal); Montagem em painel (traseira); Outro
sv: Kontaktmonteringsstil: Adapter; Kabel; Chassimonterad; Omvandlare; Koppling; DIN-skenmonterad; Genommatningskoppling; Fritt hängande; Inline; PCB-ytmontering; PCB-hålmontering; Panelmonterad; Panelmontering (fram); Panelmontering (bak); Övrigt
vi: Kiểu lắp đầu nối: Bộ chuyển đổi; Cáp; Lắp khung gầm; Bộ chuyển đổi; Bộ nối; Lắp ray DIN; Bộ nối xuyên thấu; Treo tự do; Thẳng hàng; Gắn bề mặt PCB; Xuyên lỗ PCB; Lắp bảng điều khiển; Gắn bảng điều khiển (phía trước); Gắn bảng điều khiển (phía sau); Khác
ja: コネクターの取り付けスタイル: アダプター; ケーブル; シャーシマウント; コンバーター; カプラー; DINレールマウント; フィードスルーカプラー; フリーハンギング; インライン; PCB表面実装; PCBスルーホール; パネルマウント; パネルマウント（前面）; パネルマウント（背面）; その他
de: Stecker-Montagestil: Adapter; Kabel; Gehäusemontage; Konverter; Kupplung; DIN-Schienenmontage; Durchführungskupplung; Freihängend; In Reihe; Leiterplatten-Oberflächenmontage; Leiterplatten-Durchsteckmontage; Schalttafelmontage; Plattenmontage (vorne); Plattenmontage (hinten); Sonstiges
th: รูปแบบการติดตั้งขั้วต่อ: อะแดปเตอร์; เคเบิล; ติดตั้งบนแชสซี; คอนเวอร์เตอร์; คัปเปลอร์; ติดตั้งบนราง DIN; คัปเปลอร์แบบผ่าน; แขวนอิสระ; อินไลน์; ติดตั้งพื้นผิว PCB; ทะลุรู PCB; ติดตั้งบนแผง; ติดตั้งแผง (ด้านหน้า); ติดตั้งแผง (ด้านหลัง); อื่นๆ
nb: Kontaktmonteringsstil: Adapter; Kabel; Chassismontert; Omformer; Kobling; DIN-skinnemontert; Gjennomgangskobling; Fritthengende; På linje; PCB overflatemontert; PCB gjennomhull; Panelmontert; Panelmontering (front); Panelmontering (bak); Annet
lt-LT: Jungties montavimo stilius: Adapteris; Su kabeliu; Korpuso montavimas; Keitiklis; Sujungiklis; DIN bėgelio montavimas; Perleidžiamas sujungiklis; Laisvai kabantis; Tiesi; PCB paviršinis montavimas; PCB kiauryminis montavimas; Panelės montavimas; Skydelio montavimas (priekis); Skydelio montavimas (galas); Kita
bg-BG: Стил на монтаж на конектора: Адаптер; Кабел; Монтаж към шаси; Конвертор; Съединител; Монтаж на DIN шина; Проходен съединител; Свободно висящ; В линия; PCB повърхностен монтаж; PCB монтаж през отвори; Панелен монтаж; Панелен монтаж (преден); Панелен монтаж (заден); Други
it: Stile di montaggio del connettore: Adattatore; Cavo; Montaggio su telaio; Convertitore; Giunto; Montaggio su guida DIN; Giunto passante; Libero; In linea; Montaggio superficiale su PCB; Montaggio a foro passante su PCB; Montaggio su pannello; Montaggio su pannello (frontale); Montaggio su pannello (posteriore); Altro
nl: Montagestijl van connector: Adapter; Kabel; Chassismontage; Converter; Koppelstuk; DIN-railmontage; Doorvoerkoppelstuk; Vrij hangend; Inline; PCB oppervlaktemontage; PCB doorvoergat; Paneelmontage; Paneelmontage (voorzijde); Paneelmontage (achterzijde); Andere